Alaska, session 34, SB231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2026 budget summary for the 03 operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes expressed for the 04 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 40,900 40,900 11 Commission 12 Alaska Oil and Gas 40,900 13 Conservation Commission 14 Alaska Energy Authority 250,000 250,000 15 Alaska Energy Authority 250,000 16 Rural Energy Assistance 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 Population Management 20,000,000 20,000,000 21 Institution Director's Office 20,000,000 22 Community Residential Centers 1,117,500 1,117,500 23 Community Residential 1,117,500 24 Centers 25 Health and Rehabilitation Services 2,952,500 2,952,500 26 Physical Health Care 2,952,500 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 Alaska State Council on the Arts 12,900 12,900 31 Alaska State Council on 12,900 01 the Arts 02 Student Financial Aid Programs 3,321,600 3,321,600 03 Alaska Performance 2,214,400 04 Scholarship Awards 05 Alaska Education Grants 1,107,200 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Commercial Fisheries 651,400 456,400 195,000 10 Southeast Region Fisheries 128,500 11 Management 12 Central Region Fisheries 254,600 13 Management 14 AYK Region Fisheries 109,000 15 Management 16 Westward Region Fisheries 142,700 17 Management 18 Statewide Fisheries 16,600 19 Management 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 Behavioral Health 500,000 500,000 24 Behavioral Health 500,000 25 Administration 26 Public Assistance 31,441,900 12,826,900 18,615,000 27 Public Assistance Field 26,941,900 28 Services 29 Women, Infants and 4,500,000 30 Children 31 Public Health 4,350,000 4,350,000 01 Public Health 4,350,000 02 Administrative Services 03 Senior Benefits Payment Program 1,125,000 1,125,000 04 Senior Benefits Payment 1,125,000 05 Program 06 Departmental Support Services 177,600 177,600 07 Rate Review 177,600 08 Medicaid Services 456,438,500 36,436,800 420,001,700 09 Medicaid Services 456,438,500 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 Fire Suppression, Land & Water 1,841,600 304,100 1,537,500 14 Resources 15 Fire Suppression 1,841,600 16 Preparedness 17 Parks & Outdoor Recreation 1,325,500 530,200 795,300 18 Office of History and 1,325,500 19 Archaeology 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 Taxation and Treasury 316,800 316,800 24 Alaska Retirement 150,000 25 Management Board 26 Permanent Fund Dividend 166,800 27 Division 28 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 15,300,000 15,300,000 29 AHFC Operations 15,300,000 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 01 * * * * * * * * * * 02 Administration and Support 84,000 84,000 03 Measurement Standards & 84,000 04 Commercial Vehicle 05 Compliance 06 Highways, Aviation and Facilities 543,300 500,000 43,300 07 Central Region Highways 500,000 08 and Aviation 09 Northern Region Highways 43,300 10 and Aviation 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 University of Alaska 38,000,000 38,000,000 15 Budget 23,000,000 16 Reductions/Additions - 17 Systemwide 18 Troth Yeddha' Campus 15,000,000 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 Therapeutic Courts 38,600 38,600 23 Therapeutic Courts 38,600 24 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 40,900 06 1012 Railbelt Energy Fund 250,000 07 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $290,900 08 Department of Corrections 09 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 24,070,000 10 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $24,070,000 11 Department of Education and Early Development 12 1002 Federal Receipts 12,900 13 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 3,321,600 14 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $3,334,500 15 Department of Fish and Game 16 1002 Federal Receipts 79,400 17 1003 General Fund Match 15,900 18 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 433,300 19 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 4,900 20 1007 Interagency Receipts 2,300 21 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 43,400 22 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 69,900 23 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 2,300 24 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $651,400 25 Department of Health 26 1002 Federal Receipts 442,966,700 27 1003 General Fund Match 49,263,700 28 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 1,125,000 29 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 177,600 30 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 500,000 31 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $494,033,000 01 Department of Natural Resources 02 1002 Federal Receipts 817,900 03 1003 General Fund Match 530,200 04 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 304,100 05 1007 Interagency Receipts 1,510,000 06 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 4,900 07 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $3,167,100 08 Department of Revenue 09 1002 Federal Receipts 15,300,000 10 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 68,100 11 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 52,800 12 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 27,800 13 1042 Judicial Retirement System 1,100 14 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia Retirement System 200 15 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 166,800 16 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $15,616,800 17 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 18 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 500,000 19 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 84,000 20 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 43,300 21 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $627,300 22 University of Alaska 23 1002 Federal Receipts 15,000,000 24 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 8,000,000 25 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 15,000,000 26 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $38,000,000 27 Judiciary 28 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 38,600 29 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $38,600 30 * * * Total Budget * * * $579,829,600 31 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 1003 General Fund Match 49,809,800 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 25,973,300 07 1012 Railbelt Energy Fund 250,000 08 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $76,033,100 09 Designated General Funds 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 682,500 11 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 2,300 12 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 3,321,600 13 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $4,006,400 14 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 15 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 68,100 16 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 52,800 17 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 27,800 18 1042 Judicial Retirement System 1,100 19 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia Retirement System 200 20 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 8,608,500 21 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 43,300 22 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $8,801,800 23 Other Duplicated Funds 24 1007 Interagency Receipts 1,512,300 25 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 166,800 26 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 132,300 27 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 15,000,000 28 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $16,811,400 29 Federal Receipts 30 1002 Federal Receipts 474,176,900 31 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $474,176,900 01 * * * Total Budget * * * $579,829,600 02 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 5 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Alaska Energy Authority - Bulk Fuel 5,000,000 5,000,000 10 Upgrades High Energy Cost Grant (HD 1- 11 40) 12 Alaska Energy Authority - Electrical 150,870 150,870 13 Emergencies Program (HD 1-40) 14 Alaska Energy Authority Bulk Fuel 25,000,000 25,000,000 15 Upgrades (HD 1-40) 16 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 1,201,081 1,201,081 17 Commission Risk Based Data 18 Management System Upgrade Phase 2 19 (HD 1-40) 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 Protecting Coastal Alaska Native 6,000,000 6,000,000 24 Communities (HD 1-40) 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 Child Support Case Management System 3,651,843 3,221,623 430,220 29 Replacement (HD 1-40) 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 01 * * * * * * * * * * 02 University of Alaska Museum of the 8,000,000 8,000,000 03 North Planetarium (HD 31-35) 04 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 4 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 05 1002 Federal Receipts 5,000,000 06 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 25,000,000 07 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission 1,201,081 08 Receipts 09 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 150,870 10 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $31,351,951 11 Department of Natural Resources 12 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 6,000,000 13 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $6,000,000 14 Department of Revenue 15 1002 Federal Receipts 430,220 16 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 3,221,623 17 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $3,651,843 18 University of Alaska 19 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 8,000,000 20 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $8,000,000 21 * * * Total Budget * * * $49,003,794 22 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 4 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $0 06 Designated General Funds 07 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 3,221,623 08 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission 1,201,081 09 Receipts 10 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 150,870 11 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $4,573,574 12 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 13 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 39,000,000 14 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $39,000,000 15 Other Duplicated Funds 16 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $0 17 Federal Receipts 18 1002 Federal Receipts 5,430,220 19 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $5,430,220 20 * * * Total Budget * * * $49,003,794 21 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION. The sum of $3,300,000 is 02 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Administration, legal and advocacy 03 services, office of public advocacy, to address case backlogs for the fiscal years ending 04 June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 05 * Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND EARLY DEVELOPMENT. (a) Section 06 36(d), ch. 7, SLA 2024, is amended to read: 07 (d) The proceeds from the sale of the Stratton building in Sitka by the 08 Department of Education and Early Development or the Department of Natural 09 Resources are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education and 10 Early Development, Alaska state libraries, archives and museums, for maintenance 11 and operations for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, [AND] June 30, 2026, and 12 June 30, 2027. 13 (b) The amount of federal receipts received from the American Rescue Plan Act of 14 2021 (P.L. 117-2) for the emergency assistance for non-public schools in the fiscal year 15 ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $65,500, is appropriated to the Department of 16 Education and Early Development for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 17 * Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. (a) Section 62(g), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023, is amended 18 to read: 19 (g) The sum of $2,273,300 is appropriated to the Department of Health, 20 Medicaid services, Medicaid services allocation, for creation of a cost allocation 21 assessment tool by the Department of Health, division of senior and disabilities 22 services, for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, [AND] June 30, 23 2026, June 30, 2027, June 30, 2028, June 30, 2029, June 30, 2030, and June 30, 24 2031, from the following sources: 25 (1) $2,046,000 from federal receipts; 26 (2) $227,300 from general fund match. 27 (b) Section 62(h), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023, is amended to read: 28 (h) The sum of $1,119,000 is appropriated to the Department of Health, senior 29 and disabilities services, senior and disabilities services administration, for creation of 30 a cost allocation assessment tool, for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 31 2025, [AND] June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, from the following sources: 01 (1) $698,500 from federal receipts; 02 (2) $420,500 from general fund match. 03 (c) Section 15(c), ch. 10, SLA 2025, is amended to read: 04 (c) The sum of $5,954,328 is appropriated from the general fund to the 05 Department of Health, division of public assistance, for the purpose of addressing 06 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program new investment projects for the fiscal 07 years ending June 30, 2025, [AND] June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 08 2028. 09 (d) The unexpended and unobligated general fund balance on June 30, 2026, not to 10 exceed $10,000,000, of the appropriation made in sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 24, line 32, 11 and allocated on page 25, line 7 (Department of Health, Medicaid services, Medicaid services 12 - $2,978,950,200), is reappropriated to the Department of Health, Medicaid services, 13 Medicaid services, for clinic behavioral health services for the fiscal years ending June 30, 14 2026, and June 30, 2027. 15 (e) The amount of federal receipts received from the One Big Beautiful Bill Act of 16 2025 (P.L. 119-21) for the Rural Health Transformation Program, estimated to be 17 $272,174,855.72, is appropriated to the Department of Health for the fiscal years ending 18 June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028. 19 * Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF LAW. (a) The sum of $32,024 is appropriated from the 20 general fund to the Department of Law, civil division, deputy attorney general's office, for the 21 purpose of paying judgments and settlements against the state for the fiscal year ending 22 June 30, 2026. 23 (b) The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 24 Law, civil division, for litigation relating to the defense of rights to develop and protect the 25 state's natural resources, to access land, to manage its fish and wildlife resources, and to 26 protect state sovereignty in the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 27 2028. 28 * Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. The amount necessary to pay externally 29 managed investment profit sharing fees, estimated to be $13,600,000, is appropriated to the 30 Department of Revenue from the retirement funds managed by the Alaska Retirement 31 Management Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 01 * Sec. 12. UNIVERSITY OF ALASKA. Section 74, ch. 11, SLA 2022, is amended to 02 read: 03 Sec. 74. UNIVERSITY OF ALASKA. The sum of $29,800,000 is 04 appropriated from the general fund to the University of Alaska for responding to the 05 negative economic impacts of COVID-19 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2023, 06 [AND] June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, for the 07 following purposes and in the following amounts: 08 PURPOSE AMOUNT 09 University of Alaska drone program $10,000,000 10 Critical minerals and rare earth elements $7,800,000 11 research and development 12 Heavy oil recovery method $5,000,000 13 research and development 14 Mariculture research and development $7,000,000 15 * Sec. 13. DEBT AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. Section 41(k), ch. 10, SLA 2025, is 16 amended to read: 17 (k) The amount necessary for payment of obligations and fees for the Goose 18 Creek Correctional Center, estimated to be $14,894,358 [$16,170,163], is appropriated 19 from the general fund to the Department of Administration for that purpose for the 20 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 21 * Sec. 14. FUND CAPITALIZATION. Section 43(v), ch. 10, SLA 2025, is amended to 22 read: 23 (v) The sum of $52,982,700 [$50,482,700] is appropriated to the fire 24 suppression fund (AS 41.15.210) for fire suppression activities from the following 25 sources: 26 (1) $5,000,000 [$3,000,000] from statutory designated program 27 receipts; [AND] 28 (2) $47,482,700 from the general fund; and 29 (3) $500,000 from interagency receipts. 30 * Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 31 DEVELOPMENT: CAPITAL. (a) Section 11(a), ch. 12, SLA 2025, is amended to read: 01 (a) The sum of $600,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the 02 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, for payments as 03 organization grants under AS 29.05.190 to the Xunaa Borough for the fiscal years 04 ending [JUNE 30, 2026,] June 30, 2027, [AND] June 30, 2028, and June 30, 2029. 05 (b) The amount received for Community Development Block Grant Disaster 06 Recovery programs is appropriated to the Department of Commerce, Community, and 07 Economic Development for Disaster Recovery Programs. 08 * Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS: CAPITAL. The unexpended and 09 unobligated balance, not to exceed $3,033,189, of the appropriation made in sec. 14, ch. 11, 10 SLA 2022, page 122, lines 30 - 31 (Department of Corrections, Hiland Mountain Intake 11 Administration Project - $3,200,000), is reappropriated to the Department of Corrections to 12 upgrade and replace outdated handheld radio systems and associated communications 13 equipment. 14 * Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS: CAPITAL. The 15 unexpended and unobligated balance, not to exceed $130,000, of the appropriation made in 16 sec. 14, ch. 11, SLA 2022, page 125, lines 21 - 23 (Alaska Military Youth Academy (AMYA) 17 construction, contingency, and planning - $750,000), is reappropriated to the Department of 18 Military and Veterans' Affairs to provide matching funds for the state and local cybersecurity 19 grant. 20 * Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES: 21 CAPITAL. (a) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Alaska 22 capital income fund (AS 37.05.565) is appropriated to the Department of Transportation and 23 Public Facilities for statewide critical deferred maintenance, renovation, and repair. 24 (b) The unexpended and unobligated balances, estimated to be a total of $5,121,996, 25 of the following appropriations are reappropriated to the Department of Transportation and 26 Public Facilities for responding to emergency weather, catastrophic events, and unforeseen 27 critical maintenance needs: 28 (1) sec. 1, ch. 82, SLA 2006, page 86, lines 15 - 17 (Department of 29 Transportation and Public Facilities, International Intermodal Connectivity Project - 30 $5,000,000), estimated balance of $478,949; 31 (2) sec. 1, ch. 82, SLA 2006, page 86, line 27 - 29, as amended by sec. 01 21(j)(2), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, Matanuska- 02 Susitna area-wide advanced right of way acquisition), estimated balance of $275,667; 03 (3) sec. 1, ch. 30, SLA 2007, page 78, lines 31 - 32, as amended by sec. 04 41(a)(3), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, Palmer 05 Wasilla highway improvements), estimated balance of $26,321; 06 (4) sec. 1, ch. 30, SLA 2007, page 104, lines 19 - 21 (Department of 07 Transportation and Public Facilities, MSCVE weigh station maintenance and repair - 08 $300,000), estimated balance of $8,426; 09 (5) sec. 10, ch. 29, SLA 2008, page 79, lines 8 - 10 (Department of 10 Transportation and Public Facilities, University Avenue widening and rehabilitation - 11 $5,000,000), estimated balance of $1,367,389; 12 (6) sec. 10, ch. 29, SLA 2008, page 79, lines 27 - 28, and allocated on page 13 80, lines 6 - 8 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, facilities deferred 14 maintenance, oil/water separators and fuel tank replacement - $1,431,000), estimated balance 15 of $40,254; 16 (7) sec. 10, ch. 29, SLA 2008, page 79, lines 27 - 28, and allocated on page 17 80, lines 9 - 10 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, roof repair and 18 replacement - $3,952,000), estimated balance of $2,905; 19 (8) sec. 1, ch. 15, SLA 2009, page 21, lines 24 - 26 (Department of 20 Transportation and Public Facilities, Americans with Disabilities Act compliance projects - 21 $238,000), estimated balance of $11,136; 22 (9) sec. 7, ch. 43, SLA 2010, page 37, line 11, and allocated on page 37, lines 23 12 - 14 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, highways and facilities, 24 Americans with Disabilities Act compliance projects - $500,000), estimated balance of $363; 25 (10) sec. 7, ch. 43, SLA 2010, page 37, line 11, and allocated on page 37, lines 26 18 - 20 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, highways and facilities, highway 27 safety corridors near-term improvements - $5,000,000), estimated balance of $854,555; 28 (11) sec. 1, ch. 5, FSSLA 2011, page 100, lines 15 - 18 (Department of 29 Transportation and Public Facilities, infrastructure and erosion control design and 30 environmental permitting - $300,000), estimated balance of $138,442; 31 (12) sec. 1, ch. 5, FSSLA 2011, page 101, lines 7 - 10, (Department of 01 Transportation and Public Facilities, statewide, rural airport emergency medical evacuation 02 lights battery replacement - $46,000), estimated balance of $21,695; 03 (13) sec. 13, ch. 5, FSSLA 2011, page 154, line 33, through page 155, line 3, 04 and allocated on page 155, lines 16 - 17 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, 05 emergency projects, Hyder, Salmon River levee rehabilitation - $472,000), estimated balance 06 of $7,732; 07 (14) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 132, lines 6 - 8, as amended by sec. 08 41(a)(7), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, 88th 09 Avenue, Spruce Brook Street to Elmore Road), estimated balance of $84,951; 10 (15) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 132, lines 12 - 15, as amended by sec. 11 38(b)(12), ch. 1, SSSLA 2021 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, 12 Anchorage, Johns Road and Klatt Road intersection design and build), estimated balance of 13 $99,338; 14 (16) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 133, lines 13 - 15 (Department of 15 Transportation and Public Facilities, O'Malley Trail and Sidewalk northside improvements - 16 $1,000,000), estimated balance of $14,874; 17 (17) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 133, line 28, and allocated on page 134, 18 lines 3 - 4 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, roads to resources, Resource 19 Roads Program - $2,000,000), estimated balance of $37,851; 20 (18) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 134, line 22, and allocated on page 135, 21 lines 17 - 19 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, safety, statewide, structural 22 inspection of state owned facilities - $300,000), estimated balance of $105,153; 23 (19) sec. 35(c)(1), ch. 18, SLA 2014 (Department of Transportation and 24 Public Facilities, Big Lake Road pedestrian improvements study - $250,000), estimated 25 balance of $42,601; 26 (20) sec. 35(c)(2), ch. 18, SLA 2014 (Department of Transportation and 27 Public Facilities, Central region rural airport sanitation facilities - $500,000), estimated 28 balance of $500,000; 29 (21) sec. 16(d), ch. 38, SLA 2015 (Department of Transportation and Public 30 Facilities, Replacement of the Kalsin Bay maintenance station), estimated balance of 31 $326,941; 01 (22) sec. 1, ch. 1, SSSLA 2017, page 8, lines 16 - 19 (Department of 02 Transportation and Public Facilities, Municipal Harbor Facility Grant Fund - $5,000,000), 03 estimated balance of $225,793; 04 (23) sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2018, page 10, lines 14 - 15 (Department of 05 Transportation and Public Facilities, public and community transportation state match - 06 $500,000), estimated balance of $62,157; 07 (24) sec. 8, ch. 1, SSSLA 2021, page 79, line 27 (Department of 08 Transportation and Public Facilities, Municipal Harbor Facility Grant Fund - $6,729,988), 09 estimated balance of $275,517; and 10 (25) sec. 43(c), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Transportation and Public 11 Facilities, Eagle River Road bike path repair), estimated balance of $112,986. 12 * Sec. 19. LAPSE OF APPROPRIATIONS. (a) The appropriations made in secs. 4 and 15 - 13 18 of this Act are for capital projects and lapse under AS 37.25.020. 14 (b) The appropriation made in sec. 14 of this Act is for the capitalization of a fund and 15 does not lapse. 16 * Sec. 20. RETROACTIVITY. If this Act takes effect after June 30, 2026, this Act is 17 retroactive to July 1, 2025. 18 * Sec. 21. CONTINGENCY. The appropriation made in sec. 15(a) of this Act is contingent 19 on certification of the election to create a newly formed borough or unified municipality. 20 * Sec. 22. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.